Utah statutes.
63G-6-402.   Contracts awarded by reverse auction.

(1)  As used in this section, "reverse auction" means a process where:

(a)  contracts are awarded in an open and interactive environment, which may include the use of electronic media; and

(b)  bids are opened and made public immediately, and bidders given opportunity to submit revised, lower bids, until the bidding process is complete.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding the requirements of this chapter, contracts may be awarded through a reverse auction.

(b)  The policy board shall make rules, consistent with this chapter, governing a reverse auction process.

